Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.070

Local infrastructure financing—Conditions. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The use of local infrastructure financing under this chapter is subject to the following conditions:

(1) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct, equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection no funds may be used for public improvements other than projects identified within the capital facilities, utilities, housing, or transportation element of a comprehensive plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(b) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020;

(3) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local infrastructure financing are expected to encourage private development within the revenue development area and to increase the fair market value of real property within the revenue development area;

(4) A sponsoring local government, participating local government, or participating taxing district has entered or expects to enter into a contract with a private developer relating to the development of private improvements within the revenue development area or has received a letter of intent from a private developer relating to the developer's plans for the development of private improvements within the revenue development area;

(5) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the revenue development area, as a result of the public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(6) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local government, must make a finding that local infrastructure financing:

(a) Is not expected to be used for the purpose of relocating a business from outside the revenue development area, but within this state, into the revenue development area; and

(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within the revenue development area;

(7) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local government, finds that the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local infrastructure financing are reasonably likely to:

(a) Increase private residential and commercial investment within the revenue development area;

(b) Increase employment within the revenue development area;

(c) Improve the viability of any existing communities that are based on mixed-use development within the revenue development area; and

(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local option sales and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.475, state excise tax allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues derived from the revenue development area that are equal to or greater than the respective state contributions made under this chapter;

(8) The sponsoring local government may only use local infrastructure financing in areas deemed in need of economic development or redevelopment within boundaries of the sponsoring local government.

[ 2009 c 267 s 2; 2006 c 181 s 205.]